Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB309.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 217.035 is amended to read as follows:
A food shall be deemed to be misbranded:
(1) If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular or its labeling or packaging
fails to conform with the requirements of KRS 217.037;
(2) If it is offered for sale under the name of another food;
(3) If it is an imitation of another food for which a definition and standard of identity
has been prescribed by regulations as provided by KRS 217.135; or if it is an
imitation of another food that is not subject to subsection (7) of this section, unless
its label bears in type of uniform size and prominence, the word, imitation, and,
immediately thereafter, the name of the food imitated;
(4) If its container is so made, formed, or filled as to be misleading;
(5) If in package form, unless it bears a label containing:
(a) The name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor;
and
(b) An accurate statement of the net quantity of the contents in terms of weight,
measure, or numerical count, which statement shall be separately and
accurately stated in a uniform location upon the principal display panel of the
label; provided that reasonable variations shall be permitted, and exemptions
as to small packages shall be established, by regulations prescribed by the
secretary;
(6) If any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of KRS
217.005 to 217.215 to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed
thereon with such conspicuousness (as compared with other words, statements,
designs, or devices, in the labeling) and in such terms as to render it likely to be
read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 1/8/2026 10:41 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1633
purchase and use;
(7) If it purports to be or is represented as a food for which a definition and standard of
identity has been prescribed by regulations as provided by KRS 217.135 unless:
(a) It conforms to such definition and standard; and
(b) Its label bears the name of the food specified in the definition and standard,
and insofar as may be required by such regulations, the common names of
optional ingredients (other than spices, flavoring, and coloring) present in
such food;
(8) If it purports to be or is represented as:
(a) A food for which a standard of quality has been prescribed by regulations as
provided by KRS 217.135 and its quality falls below such standard unless its
label bears, in such manner and form as such regulations specify, a statement
that it falls below such standard; or
(b) A food for which a standard or standards of fill of container have been
prescribed by regulation as provided by KRS 217.135 and it falls below the
standard of fill of container applicable thereto, unless its label bears, in such
manner and form as such regulations specify, a statement that it falls below
such standard;
(9) If it is not subject to the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, unless it bears
labeling clearly giving:
(a) The common or usual name of the food, if any there be; and
(b) In case it is fabricated from two (2) or more ingredients, the common or usual
name of each such ingredient, except that spices, flavorings, and colorings,
other than those sold as such, may be designated as spices, flavorings, and
colorings, without naming each; provided that, to the extent that compliance
with this subsection is impractical or results in deception or unfair
competition, exemptions shall be established by regulations promulgated by
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 1/8/2026 10:41 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1633
the secretary;
(10) If it purports to be or is represented for special dietary uses, unless its label bears
such information concerning its vitamin, mineral, and other dietary properties as the
secretary determines to be, and by regulations prescribes as, necessary in order to
fully inform purchasers as to its value for such uses;
(11) If it bears or contains any artificial flavoring, artificial coloring, or chemical
preservative, unless it bears labeling stating that fact; provided that to the extent that
compliance with the requirements of this subsection is impracticable, exemptions
shall be established by regulations promulgated by the secretary;
(12) If it is a product intended as an ingredient of another food and when used according
to the directions of the purveyor will result in the final food product being
adulterated or misbranded;
(13) If it is a raw agricultural commodity which is the produce of the soil, bearing or
containing a pesticide chemical applied after harvest, unless the shipping container
of such commodity bears labeling which declares the presence of such chemical in
or on such commodity and the common or usual name and the function of such
chemical; provided, however, that no such declaration shall be required while such
commodity, having been removed from the shipping container, is being held or
displayed for sale at retail out of such container in accordance with the custom of
the trade; or
(14) If it is a color additive unless its packaging and labeling are in conformity with such
packaging and labeling requirements applicable to such color additive prescribed
under the provisions of the federal act[; or
(15) If it purports to be or is represented as meat or a meat product and it contains any
cultured animal tissue produced from in vitro animal cell cultures outside of the
organism from which it is derived].
Section 2. KRS 217.175 is amended to read as follows:
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 1/8/2026 10:41 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1633
The following acts and the causing thereof within the Commonwealth of Kentucky are
hereby prohibited:
(1) The manufacture, sale, or delivery, holding or offering for sale of any food, drug,
device, or cosmetic that is adulterated or misbranded;
(2) The adulteration or misbranding of any food, drug, device, or cosmetic;
(3) The receipt in commerce of any food, drug, device, or cosmetic that is adulterated
or misbranded, and the delivery or proffered delivery thereof for pay or otherwise;
(4) The sale, delivery for sale, holding for sale, or offering for sale of any article in
violation of KRS 217.075;
(5) The dissemination of any false advertisement;
(6) The refusal to permit entry or inspection, or to permit the taking of a sample or to
permit access to records or evidence, as authorized by KRS 217.155;
(7) The giving of a guaranty or undertaking which guaranty or undertaking is false,
except by a person who relied on a guaranty or undertaking to the same effect
signed by, and containing the name and address of the person residing in the
Commonwealth of Kentucky from whom he received in good faith the food, drug,
device, or cosmetic;
(8) The removal or disposal of a detained or quarantined article in violation of KRS
217.115;
(9) The alteration, mutilation, destruction, obliteration, or removal of the whole or any
part of the labeling of, or the doing of any other act with respect to a food, drug,
device, or cosmetic, if such act is done while such article is held for sale and results
in such article being adulterated or misbranded;
(10) Forging, counterfeiting, simulating, or falsely representing, or without proper
authority using any mark, stamp, tag, label, or other identification device authorized
or required by regulations promulgated under the provisions of KRS 217.005 to
217.215;
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 1/8/2026 10:41 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1633
(11) The using, on the labeling of any drug or in any advertisement relating to such drug,
of any representation or suggestion that any application with respect to such drug is
effective under KRS 217.075, or that such drug complies with the provisions of
such section;
(12) The manufacture, sale, or exchange of any filled milk;
(13) The manufacture, mixing, compounding, selling, or offering for sale of any flour
unless the same is enriched; provided that this prohibition shall not apply to flour
sold to bakeries or other commercial secondary processors, which flour is used only
in the production of enriched flour or enriched bread or in the manufacture of
products not required to be enriched;
(14) The manufacture, baking, sale, or offering for sale of any bread except bread
conforming to the definition of enriched bread; and
(15) The manufacture, sale, or exchange of any meat or meat product that contains
cultured animal tissue produced from in vitro animal cell cultures outside of the
organism from which it is derived.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 1/8/2026 10:41 AM Jacketed